Hawaii statutes.
§302D-29.5 Facilities funding. (a)
Beginning with the 2016-2017 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the
legislature shall consider making an appropriation and bond authorization to
the commission for the design, planning, construction, repair, and maintenance
of public charter school improvements to address issues of health, safety, and
legal compliance; expand or improve instructional space; provide for food
services; or provide restroom facilities. The appropriation and bond
authorization for charter schools shall be separate from, and in addition to,
any appropriation made to charter schools pursuant to this section and section
302D-28. These amounts shall be prioritized for allocation by the charter
school facilities funding working group.

(b) The governor, pursuant to chapter 37, may
impose restrictions or reductions on appropriations for charter schools similar
to those imposed on department schools.

(c) This section shall not limit the ability
of the director of finance to modify or amend any allotment pursuant to chapter
37.

(d) There is established a charter school
facilities funding working group within the department of education, which
shall consist of the following members, or their designees:

(1) The chairperson of the commission;

(2) The executive director of the commission;

(3) The director of finance;

(4) The comptroller;

(5) The superintendent of education;

(6) An individual with expertise in real estate, to
be appointed by the chairperson of the commission; and

(7) An individual with expertise in finance, to be
appointed by the chairperson of the commission.

The commission shall develop criteria to
determine the distribution of funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (a) to
the charter schools. The criteria shall include distribution based on the need
and performance of the charter schools, overall benefit to the surrounding
community, amount of risk and availability of recourse to the State, and
whether a particular charter school received facilities funding through other
state funding, including grants-in-aid or a separate appropriation.

The charter school facilities funding working
group shall be exempt from chapter 92 and shall act in an advisory capacity to
prioritize the allocation of general fund appropriations and bond proceeds for
public charter schools to expend based on the criteria established by the
commission.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed
as restricting the authority of the commission to support the facilities needs
of the charter schools through other means. [L 2013, c 159, pt of §1; am L
2014, c 99, §19; am L 2015, c 234, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next